Missouri, session 2026, HB2051.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 168.201 and 168.205, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 168.201 and 168.205, to read as follows:
168.201. 1. Except as otherwise provided in section 168.205, the board of
education in all districts except metropolitan districts may employ and contract with a
superintendent for a term not to exceed three years from the time of making the contract, and
may employ such other servants and agents as it deems necessary, and prescribe their powers,
duties, compensation and term of office or employment which shall not exceed three years.
[It] 2. The board shall provide and keep a corporate seal.
168.205. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, two or more school
districts may share a superintendent who possesses a valid Missouri superintendent's license.
If any school districts choose to share a superintendent, they shall not be required to receive
approval from the department of elementary and secondary education but may notify the
department.
2. (1) Beginning July 1, 2023, subject to appropriation, a school district that enters
into an agreement with another school district to share a superintendent shall receive
additional state aid under this subsection.
(2) The department of elementary and secondary education shall annually distribute
thirty thousand dollars to any school district that shares a superintendent under this
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2051 2
subsection. Any such amount distributed to a school district shall be in addition to and shall
not be included in any calculation of state aid under chapter 163.
(3) To receive the additional thirty thousand dollars under this subsection, the school
district shall provide proof to the department of elementary and secondary education that the
school district will use all of the additional thirty thousand dollars received under this
subsection and at least half of the amount saved as a result of participating in sharing a
superintendent under this subsection to compensate teachers or to provide counseling
services.
(4) No school district that receives additional funding under this subsection shall
receive such funding for more than five years.
3. (1) As used in this subsection, "school administrator" means a
superintendent, assistant superintendent, or a director.
(2) The state board of education shall evaluate the administration of each school
district with a majority of its boundaries located within a county with more than one
million inhabitants. After such evaluation, the state board shall:
(a) Consolidate the school administrators for school districts that have fewer
than ten thousand students so that one superintendent, one assistant superintendent,
and one director serves no fewer than ten thousand students;
(b) Determine the appropriate number of additional administrative staff needed
for each school district that is administered by consolidated school administrators under
this subsection. Such staff positions include, but are not limited to, the directors of
curriculum, communications, transportation, public safety, food services, and human
resources; and
(c) Determine how standards relating to administrative staff in the Missouri
school improvement plan or any subsequently adopted accreditation method are met or
waived.
(3) A consolidation of school administrators under this subsection shall be
subject to the following:
(a) The salary of a consolidated school administrator shall be shared
proportionally among the school districts with a consolidated school administrator;
(b) A school district with more than ten thousand enrolled students may
consolidate school administrators; and
(c) School districts that consolidate school administrators shall share a physical
border.
(4) Subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to a school district that
consolidates school administrators under this subsection.

HB 2051 3
(5) This subsection shall not apply to a school district that receives less than
twenty percent of its funding from the state.
(6) This subsection shall apply beginning in the 2027-28 school year and in all
subsequent school years.
✔